Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 10. Foreign Limited Partnerships.

§79-14-1001.
Governing law.

The law of the jurisdiction of formation of a foreign limited partnership governs:

The internal affairs of the partnership;

The liability of a partner as partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership; and

The liability of a series of the partnership.

A foreign limited partnership is not precluded from registering to do business in this state because of any difference between the law of its jurisdiction of formation and the law of this state.

Registration of a foreign limited partnership to do business in this state does not authorize the foreign partnership to engage in any activities and affairs or exercise any power that a limited partnership may not engage in or exercise in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-1001 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 1001, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the right of action of a limited partner against a general partner. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-902.

Right of limited partner to maintain derivative action on behalf of partnership. 26 A.L.R.4th 264.

§79-14-1002.
Registration to do business in this state.

A foreign limited partnership may not do business in this state until it registers with the Secretary of State under this article.

A foreign limited partnership doing business in this state may not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless it is registered to do business in this state.

The failure of a foreign limited partnership to register to do business in this state does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the partnership or preclude it from defending an action or proceeding in this state.

A limitation on the liability of a general partner or limited partner of a foreign limited partnership is not waived solely because the partnership does business in this state without registering to do business in this state.

Section 79-14-1001(a) and (b) applies even if the foreign limited partnership fails to register under this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-1002 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 1002, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the proper plaintiff in a derivative action. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-903.

§79-14-1003.
Foreign registration statement.

To register to do business in this state, a foreign limited partnership must deliver a foreign registration statement to the Secretary of State for filing. The statement must state:

The name of the partnership and, if the name does not comply with Section 79-14-114, an alternate name adopted pursuant to Section 79-14-1006(a);

That the partnership is a foreign limited partnership;

The partnership’s jurisdiction of formation;

The street and mailing addresses of the partnership’s principal office and, if the law of the partnership’s jurisdiction of formation requires the partnership to maintain an office in that jurisdiction, the street and mailing addresses of the required office; and

The information required by Section 79-35-5(a).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-1003 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 1003, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to derivative action pleadings. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-904.

§79-14-1004.
Amendment of foreign registration statement.

A registered foreign limited partnership shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing an amendment to its foreign registration statement if there is a change in:

The name of the partnership;

The partnership’s jurisdiction of formation;

An address required by Section 79-14-1003(4); or

The information required by Section 79-35-5(a).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-1004 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 1004, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to awarding of reasonable expenses to plaintiffs in a successful derivative action. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-906.

Attorneys’ fees: cost of services provided by paralegals or the like as compensable element of award in state court.
73 A.L.R.4th 938.

§79-14-1005.
Activities not constituting doing business.

Activities of a foreign limited partnership which do not constitute doing business in this state under this article include:

Maintaining, defending, mediating, arbitrating, or settling an action or proceeding;

Carrying on any activity concerning its internal affairs, including holding meetings of its partners;

Maintaining accounts in financial institutions;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of securities of the partnership or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders by any means if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages, or security interests in property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages or security interests in property securing the debts and holding, protecting, or maintaining property;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is not in the course of similar transactions;

Owning, without more, property; and

Doing business in interstate commerce.

A person does not do business in this state solely by being a partner of a foreign limited partnership that does business in this state.

This section does not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign limited partnership to service of process, taxation, or regulation under law of this state other than this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-1006.
Noncomplying name of foreign limited partnership.

A foreign limited partnership whose name does not comply with Section 79-14-114 may not register to do business in this state until it adopts, for the purpose of doing business in this state, an alternate name that complies with Section 79-14-114. A partnership that registers under an alternate name under this subsection need not comply with the Fictitious Business Name Registration Act. After registering to do business in this state with an alternate name, a partnership shall do business in this state under:

The alternate name;

The partnership’s name, with the addition of its jurisdiction of formation; or

A name the partnership is authorized to use under the Fictitious Business Name Registration Act.

If a registered foreign limited partnership changes its name to one that does not comply with Section 79-14-114, it may not do business in this state until it complies with subsection (a) by amending its registration to adopt an alternate name that complies with Section 79-14-114.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

Fictitious Business Name Registration Act, see § 75-93-1 et seq.

§79-14-1007.
Withdrawal deemed on conversion to domestic filing entity or domestic limited liability partnership.

A registered foreign limited partnership that converts to a domestic limited liability partnership or to a domestic entity whose formation requires delivery of a record to the Secretary of State for filing is deemed to have withdrawn its registration on the effective date of the conversion.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-1008.
Withdrawal on dissolution or conversion to nonfiling entity other than limited liability partnership.

A registered foreign limited partnership that has dissolved and completed winding up or has converted to a domestic or foreign entity whose formation does not require the public filing of a record, other than a limited liability partnership, shall deliver a statement of withdrawal to the Secretary of State for filing. In the case of a partnership that has completed winding up, the statement must state:

Its name and jurisdiction of formation;

That the partnership surrenders its registration to do business in this state.

After a withdrawal under this section is effective, service of process in any action or proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the foreign limited partnership was registered to do business in this state may be made pursuant to Section 79-35-13.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-1009.
Transfer of registration.

When a registered foreign limited partnership has merged into a foreign entity that is not registered to do business in this state or has converted to a foreign entity required to register with the Secretary of State to do business in this state, the foreign entity shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing an application for transfer of registration. The application must state:

The name of the registered foreign limited partnership before the merger;

That before the merger the registration pertained to a foreign limited partnership;

The name of the applicant foreign entity into which the foreign limited partnership has merged or to which it has been converted and, if the name does not comply with Section 79-14-114, an alternate name adopted pursuant to Section 79-14-1006(a);

The type of entity of the applicant foreign entity and its jurisdiction of formation;

The street and mailing addresses of the principal office of the applicant foreign entity and, if the law of the entity’s jurisdiction of formation requires the entity to maintain an office in that jurisdiction, the street and mailing addresses of that office; and

The name and street and mailing addresses of the applicant foreign entity’s registered agent in this state.

When an application for transfer of registration takes effect, the registration of the foreign limited partnership to do business in this state is transferred without interruption to the foreign entity into which the partnership has merged or to which it has been converted.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-1010.
Termination of registration.

The Secretary of State may terminate the registration of a registered foreign limited partnership in the manner provided in subsections (b) and (c) if the partnership does not:

Pay, not later than sixty (60) days after the due date, any fee, tax, interest, or penalty required to be paid to the Secretary of State under this chapter or law other than this chapter;

Have a registered agent as required by the Mississippi Registered Agents Act; or

Deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of a change under Section 79-35-8 not later than thirty (30) days after a change has occurred in the name or address of the registered agent.

The Secretary of State may terminate the registration of a registered foreign limited partnership by:

Filing a notice of termination or noting the termination in the records of the Secretary of State; and

Delivering a copy of the notice or the information in the notation to the partnership’s registered agent or, if the partnership does not have a registered agent, to the partnership’s principal office.

The notice must state or the information in the notation must include:

The effective date of the termination, which must be at least sixty (60) days after the date the Secretary of State delivers the copy; and

The grounds for termination under subsection (a).

The authority of the registered foreign limited partnership to do business in this state ceases on the effective date of the notice of termination or notation under subsection (b), unless before that date the partnership cures each ground for termination stated in the notice or notation. If the partnership cures each ground, the Secretary of State shall file a record so stating.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-1011.
Withdrawal of registration of registered foreign limited partnership.

A registered foreign limited partnership may withdraw its registration by delivering a statement of withdrawal to the Secretary of State for filing. The statement of withdrawal must state:

The name of the partnership and its jurisdiction of formation;

That the partnership is not doing business in this state and that it withdraws its registration to do business in this state;

That the partnership revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf in this state; and

An address to which service of process may be made under subsection (b).

After the withdrawal of the registration of a foreign limited partnership, service of process in any action or proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the partnership was registered to do business in this state may be made pursuant to Section 79-35-13.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-1012.
Action by Attorney General.

The Attorney General may maintain an action to enjoin a foreign limited partnership from doing business in this state in violation of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.